Maryland, session 2025, SB0904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 2–4A–01 and 2–4A–02 and the subtitle “Subtitle 4A. Digital Advertising
Gross Revenues Tax Revenue Distribution” of Article – Tax – General of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 2–4B–01 and 2–4B–02, respectively, and
the subtitle “Subtitle 4B. Digital Advertising Gross Revenues Tax Revenue Distribution”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Division” means the Division of Consumer Protection of the Office of the
Attorney General.
13–204.1.
(A) THERE IS A PRIVACY PROTECTION AND ENFORCEMENT UNIT IN THE
DIVISION.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE UNIT IS TO PROTECT THE PRIVACY AND ONLINE
SECURITY OF INDIVIDUALS’ PERSONAL INFORMATION AND THE INDIVIDUALS’
DIGITAL RIGHTS AND TO PROTECT THE PUBLIC FROM UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR
DECEPTIVE PRACTICES INVOLVING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, CYBERSECURITY,
AND OTHER ONLINE OR DIGITAL PRIVACY ISSUES.
(C) THE UNIT SHALL:
(1) ENFORCE:

SENATE BILL 904
(I) THE MARYLAND AGE–APPROPRIATE DESIGN CODE ACT;
AND
(II) ANY STATE OR FEDERAL LAWS INVOLVING TECHNOLOGY,
ONLINE SERVICES AND PRODUCTS, CYBERSECURITY, ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE,
AND DIGITAL PRIVACY;
(2) EMPOWER AND EDUCATE STATE CONSUMERS WITH
INFORMATION ON THEIR RIGHTS AND STRATEGIES FOR PROTECTING THE
CONSUMER’S PRIVACY, ONLINE SAFETY, AND SECURITY AGAINST RISKS ASSOCIATED
WITH ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, CYBERSECURITY BREACHES, AND OTHER DIGITAL
THREATS; AND
(3) ASSIST, ADVISE, AND COOPERATE WITH LOCAL, STATE, AND
FEDERAL AGENCIES AND OFFICIALS TO PROTECT AND PROMOTE THE INTERESTS OF
CONSUMERS IN THE STATE REGARDING PRIVACY–RELATED ISSUES,
CYBERSECURITY RISKS, ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, AND UNLAWFUL ONLINE
CONDUCT OR PRACTICES.
(D) (1) THE REVENUES FROM THE DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX
SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO A SPECIAL FUND TO BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES
OF THE UNIT.
(2) THE FUND IS A CONTINUING, NONLAPSING SPECIAL FUND THAT IS
NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Education
7–447.1.
(p) (2) There is a Coordinated Community Supports Partnership Fund.
(6) The Fund consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–4A–02 OF
THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(III) Interest earnings; and
[(iii)] (IV) Any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.

SENATE BILL 904 5
24–204.
(E) (1) THE REVENUES FROM THE DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX
SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO A SPECIAL FUND, TO BE USED ONLY BY MARYLAND
PUBLIC TELEVISION TO PROVIDE DIGITAL LITERACY SUPPORT TO STUDENTS IN
KINDERGARTEN THROUGH 12TH GRADE.
(2) THE FUND IS A CONTINUING, NONLAPSING SPECIAL FUND THAT IS
NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–309.
(a) There is an Information Technology Investment Fund.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) as approved by the Secretary, money received from:
(i) the sale, lease, or exchange of communication sites,
communication facilities, or communication frequencies for information technology
purposes; or
(ii) an information technology agreement involving resource
sharing;
(3) that portion of money earned from pay phone commissions to the extent
that the commission rates exceed those in effect in December 1993;
(4) money received and accepted as contributions, grants, or gifts as
authorized under subsection (c) of this section;
(5) general funds appropriated for major information technology
development projects of any unit of State government other than a public institution of
higher education that:
(i) are unencumbered and unexpended at the end of a fiscal year;
(ii) have been abandoned; or
(iii) have been withheld by the General Assembly or the Secretary;

SENATE BILL 904
(6) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–4A–02 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(7) any investment earnings; and
[(7)] (8) any other money from any source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
Article – Tax – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(F–1) “DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX” MEANS THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER
TITLE 7.3 OF THIS ARTICLE.
2–102.
(a) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this article and in other articles
of the Code, the Comptroller shall administer the laws that relate to:
(1) the admissions and amusement tax;
(2) the boxing and wrestling tax;
(3) THE DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX;
(4) the digital advertising gross revenues tax;
[(4)] (5) the income tax;
[(5)] (6) the Maryland estate tax;
[(6)] (7) the Maryland generation–skipping transfer tax;
[(7)] (8) the motor carrier tax;
[(8)] (9) the motor fuel tax;
[(9)] (10) the sales and use tax; and
[(10)] (11) the savings and loan association franchise tax.
SUBTITLE 4A. DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX REVENUE DISTRIBUTION.

SENATE BILL 904 7
2–4A–01.
FROM THE DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX REVENUE, THE COMPTROLLER
SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE DATA BROKER
GROSS INCOME TAX LAWS TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE COST ACCOUNT.
2–4A–02.
(A) AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTION UNDER § 2–4A–01 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, OF THE REMAINING DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX REVENUE THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE:
(1) THE GREATER OF 0.75% OR $2,500,000 TO THE SPECIAL FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 13–204.1 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE FOR THE USE
OF THE PRIVACY PROTECTION AND ENFORCEMENT UNIT IN THE DIVISION OF
CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(2) THE GREATER OF 0.75% OR $2,500,000 TO THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3.5–309 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE FOR EXPEDITED PROJECTS RELATED TO
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
(3) THE GREATER OF 0.75% OR $2,500,000 TO THE SPECIAL FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 24–204 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE FOR THE USE OF
MARYLAND PUBLIC TELEVISION TO PROVIDE DIGITAL LITERACY SUPPORT TO
STUDENTS IN KINDERGARTEN THROUGH 12TH GRADE; AND
(4) THE GREATER OF 35% OR $120,000,000 TO THE COORDINATED
COMMUNITY SUPPORTS PARTNERSHIP FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–447.1 OF
THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(B) AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED UNDER § 2–4A–01 OF
THIS SUBTITLE AND SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
DISTRIBUTE THE REMAINING DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX REVENUE TO THE
BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–206 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE.
TITLE 7.3. DATA BROKER REGISTRY AND GROSS INCOME TAX.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS.
7.3–101.

SENATE BILL 904
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “APPORTIONABLE INCOME” MEANS GROSS INCOME OF A DATA BROKER
GENERATED FROM ENGAGING IN DATA BROKERING, INCLUDING INCOME RECEIVED
FROM DATA BROKERING PERFORMED OUTSIDE THE STATE IF THE INCOME WOULD
BE TAXABLE UNDER THIS TITLE IF RECEIVED FROM DATA BROKERING IN THE
STATE.
(C) (1) “BIOMETRIC INFORMATION” MEANS A RECORD OF ONE OR MORE
MEASURABLE BIOLOGICAL OR BEHAVIORAL CHARACTERISTICS THAT CAN BE USED
ALONE OR IN COMBINATION WITH EACH OTHER OR WITH OTHER INFORMATION FOR
AUTOMATED RECOGNITION OF A KNOWN OR UNKNOWN INDIVIDUAL.
(2) “BIOMETRIC INFORMATION” INCLUDES:
(I) FINGERPRINTS;
(II) RETINA AND IRIS PATTERNS;
(III) VOICEPRINTS;
(IV) DNA SEQUENCE;
(V) FACIAL CHARACTERISTICS;
(VI) GAIT;
(VII) HANDWRITING;
(VIII) KEYSTROKE DYNAMICS; AND
(IX) MOUSE MOVEMENTS.
(3) “BIOMETRIC INFORMATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) WRITING SAMPLES;
(II) WRITTEN SIGNATURES;
(III) HUMAN BIOLOGICAL SAMPLES USED FOR VALID SCIENTIFIC
TESTING OR SCREENING;

SENATE BILL 904 9
(IV) DEMOGRAPHIC DATA;
(V) TATTOO DESCRIPTIONS;
(VI) PHYSICAL DESCRIPTIONS, SUCH AS HEIGHT, WEIGHT, HAIR
COLOR, OR EYE COLOR; OR
(VII) DONATED ORGANS, TISSUES, OR PARTS, OR BLOOD OR
SERUM STORED ON BEHALF OF RECIPIENTS OR POTENTIAL RECIPIENTS OF LIVING
OR CADAVERIC TRANSPLANTS AND OBTAINED OR STORED BY A FEDERALLY
DESIGNATED ORGAN PROCUREMENT AGENCY.
(D) “BROKERED PERSONAL DATA” MEANS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
COMPUTERIZED DATA ELEMENTS ABOUT A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL, IF CATEGORIZED
OR ORGANIZED FOR SALE OR LICENSING TO ANOTHER ENTITY:
(1) THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S NAME OR THE NAME OF A MEMBER
OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S IMMEDIATE FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD;
(2) THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S ADDRESS OR AN ADDRESS FOR A
MEMBER OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S IMMEDIATE FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD;
(3) THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S DATE OF BIRTH OR PLACE OF BIRTH;
(4) THE MAIDEN NAME OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S MOTHER;
(5) BIOMETRIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL;
(6) PERSONAL DATA ABOUT THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL;
(7) THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OR THE
NUMBER OF ANY OTHER GOVERNMENT–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION FOR THE
RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL; OR
(8) OTHER INFORMATION THAT, ALONE OR IN COMBINATION WITH
OTHER INFORMATION THAT IS SOLD OR LICENSED, CAN REASONABLY BE
ASSOCIATED WITH THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL.
(E) (1) “BUSINESS ENTITY” MEANS:
(I) A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO REGULARLY ENGAGES IN
COMMERCIAL ACTIVITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF GENERATING INCOME;

SENATE BILL 904
(II) A CORPORATION OR NONPROFIT CORPORATION, LIMITED
LIABILITY COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP OR LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP,
BUSINESS TRUST, JOINT VENTURE, OR ANY OTHER FORM OF BUSINESS
ORGANIZATION THE CONSTITUENT PARTS OF WHICH SHARE A COMMON ECONOMIC
INTEREST; OR
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL THAT CONTROLS, IS CONTROLLED BY, OR IS
UNDER COMMON CONTROL WITH A PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(2) “BUSINESS ENTITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE STATE OR A UNIT OF
THE STATE, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OR A BUSINESS ENTITY OR OTHER PERSON
DURING A PERIOD IN WHICH THE BUSINESS ENTITY OR PERSON IS ACTING SOLELY
ON BEHALF OF AND AT THE DIRECTION OF THE STATE, A UNIT OF THE STATE, OR A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(F) (1) “DATA BROKER” MEANS ANY BUSINESS ENTITY THAT ENGAGES IN
DATA BROKERING.
(2) “DATA BROKER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY, AS DEFINED IN 15
U.S.C. § 1681A, A PERSON THAT FURNISHES INFORMATION TO A CONSUMER
REPORTING AGENCY, AS PROVIDED IN 15 U.S.C. § 1681S–2, OR A USER OF A
CONSUMER REPORT, AS DEFINED IN 15 U.S.C. § 1681A, TO THE EXTENT THAT THE
CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY, THE PERSON THAT FURNISHES INFORMATION TO
A CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY, OR THE USER OF A CONSUMER REPORT ENGAGES
IN ACTIVITIES THAT ARE SUBJECT TO REGULATION UNDER THE FEDERAL FAIR
CREDIT REPORTING ACT, 15 U.S.C. § 1681; AND
(II) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, AN AFFILIATE, OR A
NONAFFILIATED THIRD PARTY, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN 15 U.S.C. § 6809,
TO THE EXTENT THAT THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, AFFILIATE, OR NONAFFILIATED
THIRD PARTY IS SUBJECT TO REGULATION UNDER TITLE V OF THE
GRAMM–LEACH–BLILEY ACT, 15 U.S.C. §§ 6801 THROUGH 6809 AND REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER TITLE V OF THE GRAMM–LEACH–BLILEY ACT.
(G) “DATA BROKERING” MEANS THE ACT OF COLLECTING, AGGREGATING,
ANALYZING, BUYING, SELLING, AND SHARING BROKERED PERSONAL DATA.
(H) “DE–IDENTIFIED DATA” MEANS DATA THAT CANNOT REASONABLY BE
USED TO INFER INFORMATION ABOUT OR OTHERWISE BE LINKED TO AN IDENTIFIED

SENATE BILL 904 11
OR IDENTIFIABLE INDIVIDUAL OR A DEVICE LINKED TO THAT INDIVIDUAL,
PROVIDED THAT THE PERSON IN CONTROL OF THE DATA:
(1) TAKES REASONABLE MEASURES TO ENSURE THAT THE DATA
CANNOT BE ASSOCIATED WITH A NATURAL PERSON;
(2) PUBLICLY COMMITS TO MAINTAIN AND USE THE DATA ONLY IN A
DE–IDENTIFIED FASHION AND NOT ATTEMPT TO RE–IDENTIFY THE DATA; AND
(3) CONTRACTUALLY OBLIGATES ANY RECIPIENTS OF THE
INFORMATION TO COMPLY WITH ALL PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(I) “GROSS INCOME” MEANS THE VALUE PROCEEDING OR ACCRUING BY
REASON OF COLLECTING, AGGREGATING, ANALYZING, BUYING, SELLING, AND
SHARING BROKERED PERSONAL DATA WITHOUT ANY DEDUCTION ON ACCOUNT OF
THE COST OF TANGIBLE PROPERTY SOLD, THE COST OF MATERIALS USED, LABOR
COSTS, INTEREST, DISCOUNT, DELIVERY COSTS, TAXES, OR ANY OTHER EXPENSE
PAID OR ACCRUED AND WITHOUT ANY DEDUCTION ON ACCOUNT OF LOSSES.
(J) (1) “PERSONAL DATA” MEANS ANY INFORMATION THAT IS LINKED OR
REASONABLY LINKED TO AN IDENTIFIED OR IDENTIFIABLE NATURAL PERSON.
(2) “PERSONAL DATA” DOES NOT INCLUDE DE–IDENTIFIED DATA OR
PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION.
(K) “RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL” MEANS A PERSON WHO RESIDES IN THE
STATE.
SUBTITLE 2. DATA BROKER REGISTRY.
7.3–201.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A DATA
BROKER SHALL REGISTER WITH THE COMPTROLLER AS PROVIDED IN § 7.3–202 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A DATA BROKER IS NOT REQUIRED TO REGISTER WITH THE
COMPTROLLER IF THE BROKERED PERSONAL DATA INVOLVES ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING:
(1) PROVIDING PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION THAT IS
RELATED TO A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S BUSINESS OR PROFESSION;

SENATE BILL 904
(2) PROVIDING PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION AS PART OF A
SERVICE THAT PROVIDES ALERTS FOR HEALTH OR SAFETY PURPOSES;
(3) PROVIDING DIRECTORY ASSISTANCE OR DIRECTORY
INFORMATION SERVICES AS OR ON BEHALF OF A TELECOMMUNICATIONS CARRIER;
OR
(4) SELLING THE ASSETS OF A BUSINESS ENTITY OR A PART OF A
BUSINESS ENTITY A SINGLE TIME OR ONLY OCCASIONALLY AS PART OF A TRANSFER
OF CONTROL OVER THE ASSETS THAT IS NOT PART OF THE ORDINARY CONDUCT OF
THE BUSINESS ENTITY OR A PART OF THE BUSINESS ENTITY.
7.3–202.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, FOLLOWING A YEAR IN
WHICH A BUSINESS ENTITY MEETS THE DEFINITION OF A DATA BROKER, A DATA
BROKER SHALL:
(I) SUBMIT ON A FORM AND IN A FORMAT THE COMPTROLLER
SPECIFIES:
1. THE NAME OF THE DATA BROKER;
2. THE STREET ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF
THE DATA BROKER; AND
3. THE DATA BROKER’S PRIMARY WEBSITE AND E–MAIL
ADDRESS;
(II) PAY A FEE IN AN AMOUNT THAT THE COMPTROLLER
DETERMINES; AND
(III) INCLUDE WITH THE REGISTRATION FORM A DECLARATION
IN WHICH THE DATA BROKER:
1. STATES WHETHER A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S
PRECISE GEOLOCATION INFORMATION IS A PART OF THE DATA BROKER’S DATA
BROKERING ACTIVITY;
2. STATES WHETHER RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS’
CONSUMER HEALTH DATA IS A PART OF THE DATA BROKER’S DATA BROKERING
ACTIVITY;

SENATE BILL 904 13
3. STATES WHETHER RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS MAY OPT
OUT OF ALL OR A PORTION OF THE DATA BROKER’S USE OF THEIR BROKERED
PERSONAL DATA;
4. A. IDENTIFIES WHICH OF THE DATA BROKER’S
ACTIVITIES A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL MAY OPT OUT OF; AND
B. IDENTIFIES WHICH PORTION OF THE RESIDENT
INDIVIDUAL’S BROKERED PERSONAL DATA THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL MAY OPT
OUT FROM PROVIDING OR PERMITTING THE DATA BROKER TO USE;
5. DESCRIBES THE METHOD BY WHICH A RESIDENT
INDIVIDUAL MAY EXERCISE THE CHOICES DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 3 AND 4 OF THIS
ITEM; AND
6. STATES WHETHER A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL MAY
AUTHORIZE AN INDIVIDUAL TO EXERCISE THE OPTIONS DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 3 AND
4 OF THIS ITEM ON THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL’S BEHALF AND IF SO, THE
APPROPRIATE PROCESS FOR THE AUTHORIZATION.
(2) (I) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ESTABLISH THE FEE REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS SUFFICIENT
TO PAY THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING THE REGISTRATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) THE FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
DEPOSITED IN THE GENERAL FUND.
(B) (1) IF A DATA BROKER COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL APPROVE THE REGISTRATION.
(2) A REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION IS VALID UNTIL
DECEMBER 31 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE COMPTROLLER APPROVES THE
REGISTRATION.
7.3–203.
(A) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION THAT BUSINESS
ENTITIES SUBMIT FOR REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE
ON THE COMPTROLLER’S WEBSITE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN

SENATE BILL 904
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE FOLLOWING:
(1) HOW MANY BUSINESS ENTITIES REGISTERED WITH THE
COMPTROLLER AS DATA BROKERS IN THAT YEAR;
(2) THE FEE THE COMPTROLLER CHARGED FOR REGISTRATION PER
DATA BROKER AND THE TOTAL REVENUE COLLECTED;
(3) HOW MANY BUSINESS ENTITIES WERE FINED FOR
NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES IS
RELEVANT.
SUBTITLE 3. DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX.
7.3–301.
A TAX IS IMPOSED ON THE ANNUAL GROSS INCOME OF A DATA BROKER.
7.3–302.
THE DATA BROKERING TAX RATE IS 6% OF THE GROSS INCOME OF A DATA
BROKER APPORTIONED UNDER § 7.3–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7.3–303.
(A) THE APPORTIONABLE INCOME OF A DATA BROKER IS APPORTIONED TO
THE STATE BY MULTIPLYING ITS APPORTIONABLE INCOME BY THE RECEIPTS
FACTOR DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) (1) THE NUMERATOR OF THE RECEIPTS FACTOR IS THE TOTAL GROSS
INCOME OF THE DATA BROKER ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE STATE DURING THE TAXABLE
YEAR FROM ENGAGING IN DATA BROKERING DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.
(2) THE DENOMINATOR OF THE RECEIPTS FACTOR IS THE TOTAL
GROSS INCOME OF THE DATA BROKER FROM ENGAGING IN DATA BROKERING
EVERYWHERE IN THE WORLD DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.
(C) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, FOR
PURPOSES OF COMPUTING THE RECEIPTS FACTOR UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS

SENATE BILL 904 15
SECTION, GROSS INCOME OF A DATA BROKER GENERATING SALES OR EXCHANGE
FOR CONSIDERATION OF PERSONAL DATA IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE STATE IN THE
RATIO, EXPRESSED AS A PERCENTAGE, THAT THE NUMBER OF MARYLAND
ADDRESSES IN THE PERSONAL DATA BEARS TO ALL ADDRESSES IN THE PERSONAL
DATA.
(II) ONLY PERSONAL DATA USED TO GENERATE THE GROSS
INCOME OF THE BUSINESS TO BE ATTRIBUTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS
APPLICABLE IN CALCULATING THE RATIO DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) IF THE DATA BROKER IS UNABLE TO ATTRIBUTE GROSS INCOME
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, GROSS INCOME OF THE DATA BROKER
GENERATED FROM MAKING SALES, OR EXCHANGING FOR CONSIDERATION, OF
PERSONAL DATA IS ATTRIBUTED TO THE STATE:
(I) IN THE RATIO, EXPRESSED AS A PERCENTAGE, OF THE
POPULATION OF THE STATE TO ALL THE STATES OF THE UNITED STATES IN THE
DATA BROKERS’ MARKET; OR
(II) BY ANY OTHER REASONABLE METHODS OF ATTRIBUTION
ALLOWED BY THE COMPTROLLER.
(D) (1) (I) A DATA BROKER MAY CALCULATE THE RECEIPTS FACTOR
FOR THE CURRENT TAXABLE YEAR BASED ON THE MOST RECENT CALENDAR YEAR
FOR WHICH INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE FOR THE FULL CALENDAR YEAR.
(II) IF A DATA BROKER DOES NOT CALCULATE THE RECEIPTS
FACTOR FOR THE CURRENT TAXABLE YEAR BASED ON PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR
INFORMATION, THE DATA BROKER SHALL USE THE CURRENT YEAR INFORMATION
TO CALCULATE THE RECEIPTS FACTOR FOR THE CURRENT TAXABLE YEAR.
(2) A DATA BROKER SHALL CORRECT THE REPORTING FOR THE
CURRENT TAXABLE YEAR WHEN COMPLETE INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE TO
CALCULATE THE RECEIPTS FACTOR FOR THAT YEAR, BUT NOT LATER THAN
OCTOBER 31 OF THE FOLLOWING TAXABLE YEAR.
SUBTITLE 4. RETURNS.
7.3–401.

SENATE BILL 904
(A) EACH DATA BROKER THAT, IN A CALENDAR YEAR, HAS GROSS INCOME
DERIVED FROM DATA BROKERING SHALL COMPLETE, UNDER OATH, AND FILE WITH
THE COMPTROLLER A RETURN ON OR BEFORE APRIL 15 THE NEXT YEAR.
(B) A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
FILE WITH THE RETURN AN ATTACHMENT THAT STATES ANY INFORMATION THAT
THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES.
7.3–402.
A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 7.3–401 OF THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF DATA BROKERING AND THE BASIS FOR THE
CALCULATION OF THE DATA BROKERING GROSS INCOME TAX OWED.
SUBTITLE 5. TAX PAYMENT.
7.3–501.
EACH PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 7.3–401 OF THIS TITLE
SHALL PAY THE DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX WITH THE RETURN THAT COVERS
THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE TAX IS DUE.
13–201.
In this subtitle, “tax information” means:
(4) any information contained in:
(i) an admissions and amusement tax return;
(ii) an alcoholic beverage tax return;
(iii) a bay restoration fee return;
(iv) a boxing and wrestling tax return;
(v) A DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX RETURN;
(VI) a digital advertising gross revenues tax return;
[(vi)] (VII) an E–9–1–1 fee return;
[(vii)] (VIII) a financial institution franchise tax return;
[(viii)] (IX) an inheritance tax return;

SENATE BILL 904 17
[(ix)] (X) a Maryland estate tax return;
[(x)] (XI) a motor carrier tax return;
[(xi)] (XII) a motor fuel tax return;
[(xii)] (XIII) an other tobacco products tax return;
[(xiii)] (XIV) a public service company franchise tax return;
[(xiv)] (XV) a sales and use tax return;
[(xv)] (XVI) a savings and loan association franchise tax return;
[(xvi)] (XVII) a tire recycling fee return;
[(xvii)] (XVIII) a tobacco tax return; or
[(xviii)] (XIX) a transportation services assessment return.
13–402.
(a) If a notice and demand for a return is made under § 13–303 of this title and
the person or governmental unit fails to file the return, the tax collector shall:
(5) for public service company franchise tax:
(i) estimate gross receipts from the best information in the
possession of the tax collector; and
(ii) assess the tax due on the estimated gross receipts; [and]
(6) for digital advertising gross revenues tax:
(i) estimate gross revenues from the best information in possession
of the tax collector; and
(ii) assess the tax due on the estimated assessable base; AND
(7) FOR DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX:
(I) ESTIMATE THE GROSS INCOME FROM THE BEST
INFORMATION IN POSSESSION OF THE TAX COLLECTOR; AND

SENATE BILL 904
(II) ASSESS THE TAX DUE ON THE ESTIMATED ASSESSABLE
BASE.
13–508.
(a) Within 30 days after the date on which a notice of assessment of the
admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax, DATA
BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, public service
company franchise tax, financial institution franchise tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax
is mailed, a person or governmental unit against which the assessment is made may submit
to the tax collector:
(1) an application for revision of the assessment; or
(2) except for the public service company franchise tax, if the assessment
is paid, a claim for refund.
(b) If a person or governmental unit fails to submit an application for revision or
claim for refund within the time allowed in subsection (a) of this section, the assessment
becomes final.
(c) The Comptroller or an employee of the Comptroller’s office expressly
designated by the Comptroller promptly:
(1) (i) shall hold an informal hearing on a person’s or governmental
unit’s admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax,
DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales
and use tax, or tobacco tax application for revision or claim for refund under subsection (a)
of this section; and
(ii) after the hearing:
1. shall act on the application for revision; and
2. may assess any additional tax, penalty, and interest due;
and
(2) shall mail to the person or governmental unit a notice of final
determination.
13–509.
(a) Notwithstanding a person’s failure to file a timely application for revision or
claim for refund of an assessment of the admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage
tax, boxing and wrestling tax, DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX, income tax, motor
carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax under § 13–508(a) of this

SENATE BILL 904 19
subtitle, the Comptroller or the Comptroller’s designee may issue an order decreasing or
abating an assessment to correct an erroneous assessment.
(b) If action is taken under subsection (a) of this section, the order shall state
clearly the reasons for decreasing or abating the assessment.
(c) Any order issued by the Comptroller under subsection (a) of this section shall
be final and not subject to appeal.
(d) The Comptroller’s refusal to enter an order under subsection (a) of this section
shall be final and not subject to appeal.
13–1001.
(H) A PERSON WHO IS REQUIRED TO FILE A DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME
TAX RETURN AND WHO WILLFULLY FAILS TO FILE THE RETURN AS REQUIRED UNDER
TITLE 7.3 OF THIS ARTICLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS
SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5
YEARS OR BOTH.
13–1002.
(b) A person, including an officer of a corporation, who willfully files A FALSE
DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX RETURN, a false digital advertising gross revenues
tax return, a false financial institution franchise tax return, a false public service company
franchise tax return, or a false income tax return with the intent to evade the payment of
tax due under this article is guilty of perjury and, on conviction, is subject to the penalty
for perjury.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section apply to the alcoholic beverage, DATA
BROKER GROSS INCOME, digital advertising gross revenues, financial institution
franchise, public service company franchise, and income taxes.
13–1101.
(b) An assessment of digital advertising gross revenues tax, financial institution
franchise tax, public service company franchise tax, income tax, or estate tax may be made
at any time if:
(1) a false return is filed with the intent to evade the tax;
(2) a willful attempt is made to evade the tax;
(3) a return is not filed as required under Title 7, TITLE 7.3, Title 7.5, Title
8, or Title 10 of this article;

SENATE BILL 904
(4) an amended estate tax return is not filed as required under Title 7 of
this article;
(5) an incomplete return is filed; or
(6) a report of federal adjustment is not filed within the period required
under § 13–409 of this title.
(c) If a report of federal adjustment is filed within the time required under §
13–409 of this title, the tax collector shall assess the DATA BROKER GROSS INCOME TAX,
digital advertising gross revenues tax, financial institution franchise tax, public service
company franchise tax, income tax, or estate tax within 1 year after the date on which the
tax collector receives the report.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–204.1.
(c) The Unit shall:
(1) Enforce:
(i) The Maryland Age–Appropriate Design Code Act;
(II) THE ONLINE DATA PRIVACY ACT; and
[(ii)] (III) Any State or federal laws involving technology, online
services and products, cybersecurity, artificial intelligence, and digital privacy;
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the data broker gross income
tax enacted under Section 2 of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on
or after December 31, 2026.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2025, the effective date of Chapters 454 and 455 of the Acts of the General
Assembly of 2024. If the effective date of Chapters 454 and 455 is amended, Section 3 of
this Act shall take effect on the taking effect of Chapters 454 and 455.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.